New Jersey, session 221, A2774.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Commissioner of Health shall require each general hospital licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) to designate and maintain at least one bereavement area in a private room within the hospital that may be used by individuals who have received upsetting news concerning a family member receiving treatment at the hospital including, but not limited to, notice that the family member has died. 2.    This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.